Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-1738
Handicapped or disabled persons, defined; parking; permits; issuance; procedure; renewal.

(1) The clerk of any city of the primary class, first class, or second class or village shall, or the county clerk or designated county official pursuant to section 23-186 or the Department of Motor Vehicles may, take an application from a handicapped or disabled person or temporarily handicapped or disabled person or his or her parent, legal guardian, or foster parent for a permit which will entitle the holder thereof or a person driving a motor vehicle for the purpose of transporting such holder to park in those spaces or access aisles provided for by sections 18-1736 to 18-1741 when the holder of the permit will enter or exit the motor vehicle while it is parked in such spaces or access aisles. For purposes of this section, the handicapped or disabled person or temporarily handicapped or disabled person shall be considered the holder of the permit.

(2) For purposes of sections 18-1736 to 18-1741, handicapped or disabled person shall mean any individual with a severe visual or physical impairment which limits personal mobility and results in an inability to travel unassisted more than two hundred feet without the use of a wheelchair, crutch, walker, or prosthetic, orthotic, or other assistant device, any individual whose personal mobility is limited as a result of respiratory problems, any individual who has a cardiac condition to the extent that his or her functional limitations are classified in severity as being Class III or Class IV, according to standards set by the American Heart Association, and any individual who has permanently lost all or substantially all the use of one or more limbs. Temporarily handicapped or disabled person shall mean any handicapped or disabled person whose personal mobility is expected to be limited in such manner for no longer than one year.

(3) A person applying for a permit or for the renewal of a permit shall complete an application, shall provide proof of identity, and shall submit a completed medical form containing the statutory criteria for qualification and signed by a physician, a physician assistant, or an advanced practice registered nurse practicing under and in accordance with his or her certification act, certifying that the person who will be the holder meets the definition of handicapped or disabled person or temporarily handicapped or disabled person. No applicant shall be required to provide his or her social security number. In the case of a temporarily handicapped or disabled person, the certifying physician, physician assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse shall indicate the estimated date of recovery or that the temporary handicap or disability will continue for a period of six months, whichever is less. A person may hold only one permit under this section and may hold either a permit under this section or a permit under section 18-1738.01, but not both. The Department of Motor Vehicles shall provide applications and medical forms to the clerk or designated county official. The application form shall contain information listing the legal uses of the permit and that the permit is not transferable, is to be used by the party to whom issued or for the motor vehicle for which it is issued, is not to be altered or reproduced, and is to be used only when a handicapped or disabled person or a temporarily handicapped or disabled person will enter or exit the motor vehicle while it is parked in a designated parking space or access aisle. The application form shall provide space for the applicant to sign a statement that he or she is aware of his or her rights, duties, and responsibilities with regard to the use and possession of a handicapped or disabled parking permit and the penalties provided by law for handicapped parking infractions. The application form shall also indicate that those convicted of handicapped parking infractions shall be subject to suspension of the permit for six months. A copy of the completed application form shall be given to each applicant. Before a permit is issued, the department shall enter all information required in the manner prescribed by section 18-1739. The clerk or designated county official shall submit to the department the name, address, and license number of all persons applying for a permit pursuant to this section. An application for the renewal of a permit under this section may be filed within thirty days prior to the expiration of the permit. The existing permit shall be invalid upon receipt of the new permit. Following the receipt of the application and its processing, the Department of Motor Vehicles shall deliver each individual renewed permit to the applicant in person or by first-class United States mail, postage prepaid, as circumstances permit, except that renewed permits shall not be issued sooner than ten days prior to the date of expiration.

(4) The Department of Motor Vehicles, upon receipt from the clerk or designated county official of a completed application form and completed medical form from an applicant for a handicapped parking permit under this section, shall verify that the applicant qualifies for such permit and, if so, shall issue the same by delivering the permit to the applicant in person or by first-class United States mail, postage prepaid, as circumstances permit. Upon issuing such permit, the department shall provide the basic issuing data to the clerk or designated county official of the city or county where the permitholder resides or, if different, to the clerk or designated county official who originally accepted the application.

Laws 1977, LB 13, § 3;

Laws 1979, LB 146, § 3;

Laws 1980, LB 717, § 4;

Laws 1987, LB 598, § 3;

Laws 1989, LB 516, § 1;

Laws 1992, LB 928, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 112, § 3;

Laws 1993, LB 632, § 10;

Laws 1995, LB 593, § 3;

Laws 1996, LB 1211, § 3;

Laws 2000, LB 1115, § 1;

Laws 2001, LB 809, § 3;

Laws 2005, LB 256, § 15.